District of Columbia statutes.
7-2105

Inspections.

(a)

(1)

To ensure that each new facility will be in compliance with this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, and all other applicable laws, the Mayor shall conduct an on-site inspection before a facility’s initial licensure. Instead of issuing a full-year license to a new facility or licensee, the Mayor may issue a provisional license under § 7-2107(b) pending satisfactory completion of additional, follow-up inspections. After initial licensure, the Mayor shall conduct at least 1 on-site inspection before each licensure renewal.

(2)

The Mayor shall at least once a year inspect all facilities caring for District children outside the District to ensure that each of these facilities is in substantial compliance with this chapter, the rules issued pursuant to this chapter, and all other applicable laws. One year after the issuance of rules under § 7-2103, the Mayor shall report to the Council on the cost and efficacy of implementing this paragraph and on the extent to which facilities caring for District children outside the District are required by their respective jurisdictions to meet licensure standards comparable to those adopted under § 7-2103. Within 45 days after receiving the Mayor’s report, the Council shall determine whether this paragraph should be amended to authorize the Mayor to accept licensure by other jurisdictions in lieu of conducting annual inspections.

(b)

The Mayor may at any reasonable hour enter a facility for the purpose of conducting an announced or unannounced inspection to check for compliance with this chapter, a rule issued pursuant to this chapter, or any other District or locally enforceable federal law. When conducting an inspection, especially of a foster home, the Mayor shall respect the homelike atmosphere of the facility and the reasonable privacy interests of its residents and adult caregivers.

(c)

Any District government employee who, while visiting a facility for the purpose of casework or monitoring, observes a condition that he or she believes in violation of this chapter, a rule issued pursuant to this chapter, or any other District or federal law shall, no later than 7 days after making the observation and if not previously reported, report this suspected violation to the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs (“DCRA”).

(d)

The Mayor shall make all licensure and inspection reports available to the public upon request and shall notify all child-placing agencies in the District whenever a facility’s license is suspended, revoked, converted to a provisional or restricted license, or not renewed.

History

Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-139, § 6, 33 DCR 3804

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2106, § 7-2107, and § 7-2108.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-805.